Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 4 Freight Receipts, Freight Bills, and Freight Lists

Cross references.

Warehouse receipts, bills of lading, and other documents of title, §

11-7-101

et seq.

Georgia State Warehouse Act, §

10-4-1

et seq.

46-9-110.
Issuance of receipts by common carriers to persons delivering goods for transportation; contents of receipts.

Whenever any person delivers property of any description to a common carrier for transportation, the common carrier shall, upon demand, furnish the delivering party a valid receipt which shall specify the shipping marks and numbers thereon and the weight of the property thus delivered, whenever the value can be estimated by weight. In all cases where the value cannot be thus estimated, the receipt shall give a general description of the property and shall also specify as near as practicable the quantity or value thereof. In addition, any such receipt shall designate the place of destination of the property.

Any agent or officer of any common carrier who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 236, § 1; Code 1868, § 4514; Ga. L. 1870, p. 400, § 1; Code 1873, § 4604; Code 1882, § 4604; Penal Code 1895, § 602; Penal Code 1910, § 633; Code 1933, §§ 18-308, 18-9915.

46-9-111.
Issuance by railroad companies of duplicate freight receipts to shippers; contents of receipts; delivery of freight to consignee on presentation of railroad receipt.

All railroad companies in this state shall, on demand, issue duplicate freight receipts to shippers, which receipts shall state the class or classes of freight shipped, the freight charges over the road giving the receipt, and, so far as practicable, the freight charges over other roads that carry the freight. When the consignee presents the railroad receipt to the agent of the railroad that delivers such freight, the agent shall deliver the article shipped on payment of the rate charged for the class of freight mentioned in the receipt.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 13; Code 1882, § 719m; Civil Code 1895, § 2200; Civil Code 1910, § 2643; Code 1933, § 93-402.

46-9-112.
Contents of freight bills and freight lists.

All freight bills or freight lists charged against or to be collected from any person for whom a common carrier carries freight in this state shall, before they may be collectable, contain a certain and specific description of the items of freight charged in such bills or freight lists.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 155, § 1; Code 1868, § 2052; Code 1873, § 2078; Code 1882, § 2078; Civil Code 1895, § 2293; Civil Code 1910, § 2747; Code 1933, § 18-310.